District of Columbia statutes.
5-631

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Act” means subchapter I of Chapter 7 of Title 5 [§ 5-701 et seq.].

(2)

“Chief” means either the Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department or the Chief of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department.

(3)

“Department” means the Metropolitan Police Department or the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department.

(4)

“Director” means either the director of medical services for the Metropolitan Police Department, or the medical services officer for the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department.

(5)

“Full range of duties” means the ability of a member to perform all of the essential functions of police work or fire suppression as determined by the established policies and procedures of the Metropolitan Police Department or the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, and to meet the physical examination and physical agility standards established under §§ 5-107.02a and 5-451.

(6)

“Limited duty” means a temporary status for members who, because of injury or other temporary medical disability, are not able to perform the full range of duties, but are certified by a Police and Fire Clinic physician as being capable of effectively performing certain types of work within the department.

(7)

“Member” means a sworn employee of the Metropolitan Police Department or the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department.

History

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 621, 51 DCR 9406

Editor's Notes

Section 641 of D.C. Law 15-194 provided

“Sec. 641. Applicability subject to availability of appropriations.

“This title referring to Chapter 6A shall be subject to the availability of appropriations.”

Application of Titles I and VI of D.C. Law 15-194: Section 1301 of D.C. Law 15-194 provided:

“Titles I and VI of this act shall apply to pre-1980 employees of the Metropolitan Police Department and the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department upon their enactment by Congress.”

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 15-194, Subtitle D as subchapter II of this chapter, the preexisting text, §§ 5-631 through 5-635, has been designated as subchapter I.